Hawaii statutes.
§602-53 Terms. The intermediate
appellate court shall be deemed always to be in continuous session. The court
shall be deemed always open for filing papers, issuing and returning process,
and issuing orders. [L 1979, c 111, pt of §3; am L 1984, c 106, §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next